spellrelax.twol
Alphabet

ьа
ьэ
ьо
ьу

я
е
ё
ю

%':%' %ʼ:%' ! U0027
%`:%` %ʼ:%` ! U0060
%ʻ:%ʻ %ʼ:%ʻ ! U02BB
%’:%’ %ʼ:%’ ! U2019
%‘:%‘ %ʼ:%‘ ! U2018
%ʼ:%ʼ %ʼ:%ʼ ! U02BC - set everything to this

%{ьа%}:ьа
%{ьэ%}:ьэ
%{ьо%}:ьо
%{ьу%}:ьу

;

Rules

"Unify apostrophe styles"
a => _ ;

"/ja/"
%{ьа%}:я <=> _ ;

"/je/"
%{ьэ%}:е <=> _ ;

"/jo/"
%{ьо%}:ё <=> _ ;

"/ju/"
%{ьу%}:ю <=> _ ;
